Arkansas, session 2025, SB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-12-120(c), concerning payment of
retirement benefits to city attorneys in cities of the first class and cities
of the second class, is amended to read as follows:
(c) All payments of retirement benefits under this section shall be
payable monthly and shall be paid from the general funds of by the city.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-12-121(b)(2), concerning retirement
payments to city clerks and clerk-treasurers, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its
general fund account.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-12-122(b)(2), concerning retirement
payments to deputy city clerks, is amended to read as follows:
*LJH102*
03-31-2025 10:28:55 LJH102

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB153
(2) The retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its
general fund account when appropriated for that purpose by the governing body
of the city.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-12-123(a)(2), concerning retirement
payments to mayors of cities of the first class, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The retirement payments shall be paid monthly and shall be
paid from the city general fund by the city.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 24-12-125(b)(2), concerning retirement
payments to treasurers of cities of the first class, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Upon approval by the governing body of the city, the
retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its general fund account.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 24-12-127(b)(2), concerning retirement
payments to recorder-treasurers and city treasurers of cities of the second
class, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its
general fund account.

/s/J. Dotson













03-31-2025 10:28:55 LJH102